Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 16. Wyoming Centennial Commission

§ 9-2-1601.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986, ch. 90, § 1, related to the creation of commission, appointment, membership, salary, meetings and termination.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 501, provides: “All property and duties of the Wyoming centennial commission are transferred to the state board of land commissioners.”

§ 9-2-1602.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986 ch 90 § 1, related to the director, duties and additional staff.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 9-2-1603.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986 ch 90 § 1, related to comprehensive state plan.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 9-2-1604.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986 ch 90 § 1, related to official Wyoming centennial logo, development, and rules and regulations.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 9-2-1605.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986 ch 90 § 1, related to additional powers and duties of commissioner.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 9-2-1606.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1986 ch 90 § 1, related to donations and deposit and expenditure of monies.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 9-2-1607.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1987, ch. 90, § 1, related to the Wyoming Centennial Commission sending a final report to the governor and the legislature.

Laws 2008, ch. 44, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 5, 2008.

§ 9-2-1608.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1988, ch. 33, § 1, related to centennial acre, authorization, designation and source of land.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 9-2-1609.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 168, § 205.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1988 ch 33 § 1, related to centennial acre, sale of deeds, title and management of land.

Laws 2009, ch 168, § 602, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.